Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-749
Warrant of arrest; recall; issuance.

The Governor may recall his warrant of arrest or may issue another warrant whenever he deems proper.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 21, p. 565.